fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Activités et sports d'hiver > Ski et snowboard > Cire pour ski et snowboard: Farts de préparation de semelle de ski et de snowboard; Cire de glisse pour skis et snowboards; Cire d'adhérence pour skis et snowboards; Traitements pour peaux d’ascension de ski et de snowboard
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport e attività invernali > Sci e snowboard > Cera per sci e snowboard: Scioline di preparazione della soletta per sci e snowboard; Sciolina per sci e snowboard; Cera per grip per sci e snowboard; Trattamenti per pelli di foca da sci e snowboard
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Esportes e atividades de inverno > Esqui e snowboarding > Cera para esquis e pranchas de snowboarding: Cera de preparação de base para esqui e snowboard; Cera deslizante para esqui e snowboard; Cera de aderência para esqui e snowboard; Tratamentos para peles de esqui e snowboard
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウィンタースポーツ > スキー・スノーボード用品 > スキー・スノーボード用ワックス: スキー・スノーボード用ベースプレップワックス; スキー・スノーボード用グライドワックス; スキー・スノーボード用グリップワックス; スキー・スノーボード用スキントリートメント
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Téli sportok és tevékenységek > Síelés és snowboardozás > Sí- és snowboardviasz: Alapozó viaszok síléchez és snowboardhoz; Sí- és snowboard-csúszóviasz; Sí- és snowboard-tapadóviasz; Túrasí- és snowboardfóka-kezelők
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Zimski sportovi i aktivnosti > Skijanje i snowboardanje > Vosak za skije i snowboarde: Vosak za osnovnu pripremu za skijanje i snowboardanje; Vosak za klizanje za skije i snowboarde; Vosak za prianjanje na skijama i snowboardima; Tretmani za kožu za skijanje i snowboardanje
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Hoạt động và thể thao mùa đông > Trượt tuyết băng đồng và trượt ván trên tuyết > Sáp trượt tuyết và trượt ván: Sáp nền cho ván trượt và ván trượt tuyết; Sáp trượt cho ski & ván trượt tuyết; Sáp chống trượt cho ski & ván trượt tuyết; Dung dịch bảo dưỡng da dán ván trượt và ván trượt tuyết
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Actividades y deportes de invierno > Esquí y snowboard > Cera para esquí y snowboard: Cera de preparación de base para esquí y snowboard; Cera deslizante para esquí y snowboard; Cera para agarre de esquí y snowboard; Tratamientos para pieles de esquí y snowboard
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Zimné športy a aktivity > Lyžovanie a snowboarding > Vosk na lyže a snowboardy: Vosk na prípravu lyží a snowboardov; Sklzný vosk na lyže a snowboardy; Grip vosk na lyže a snowboard; Prípravky na úpravu sklznice pre lyže a snowboardy
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 冬季运动与活动 > 滑雪与单板滑雪 > 滑雪板打蜡工具: 滑雪板底蜡; 滑雪板/单板滑行蜡; 滑雪板/单板抓地蜡; 滑雪板止滑带护理剂
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Activități și sporturi de iarnă > Schi și snowboarding > Ceară pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding: Ceară de pregătire a tălpii pentru schi și snowboard; Ceară pentru alunecare pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Ceară pentru priză pentru schiuri și plăci de snowboarding; Produse de tratare a pielii pentru schi și snowboard
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kış Sporları ve Aktiviteleri > Kayak ve Snowboard > Kayak ve Snowboard Cilası: Kayak ve snowboard taban hazırlık vaksı; Kayak ve Snowboard Glide Wax; Kayak ve Snowboard Grip Wax; Kayak ve snowboard kaplama bakımları
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Atividades e desportos de inverno > Esqui e snowboard > Cera para esqui e snowboard: Cera de preparação de base para ski e snowboard; Cera para deslize para esqui e snowboard; Cera para aderência para esqui e snowboard; Tratamentos para peles de ski e snowboard
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Zimski športi in dejavnosti > Smučanje in deskanje na snegu > Vosek za smuči in snowboard deske: Vosek za pripravo smuči in snežnih desk; Maziva za smuči in snowboard deske; Vosek za oprijem smuči in deske; Impregnacija in nega turnosmučarskih kož
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og -aktiviteter > Ski og snowboard > Voks til ski og snowboard: Grundvoks til ski og snowboard; Ski og snowboard – glidevoks; Ski og snowboard – grebvoks; Behandling af skind til ski og snowboard
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Vintersport og aktiviteter > Ski- og snowboardutstyr > Voks for ski og snowboard: Grunnvoks for ski og snowboard; Glidevoks for ski og snowboard; Grepvoks for ski og snowboard; Behandling av feller for ski og snowboard
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Wintersport & -Aktivitäten > Skisport & Snowboarden > Ski- & Snowboard-Wachs: Grundierwachs für Ski & Snowboards; Ski- & Snowboard-Gleitwachs; Ski- & Snowboard-Griffwachs; Fellpflegemittel für Ski & Snowboards
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 겨울 스포츠/액티비티 > 스키/스노보드 > 스키/스노보드 왁스: 스키 및 스노보드 베이스 프렙 왁스; 스키/스노보드 글라이드 왁스; 스키/스노보드 그립 왁스; 스키 및 스노보드 스킨 트리트먼트
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Χειμερινά αθλήματα & δραστηριότητες > Σκι & σνόουμπορντ > Κερί για σκι & σνόουμπορντ: Κεριά προετοιμασίας βάσης για σκι και snowboard; Κερί ολίσθησης για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Κερί πρόσφυσης για σκι & σνόουμπορντ; Προϊόντα περιποίησης για δέρματα σκι και snowboard
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Sporty zimowe i rekreacja zimą > Jazda na nartach i snowboardzie > Smary do nart i desek snowboardowych: Smary podkładowe do nart i snowboardu; Wosk poślizgowy do nart i snowboardu; Wosk do nart i snowboardu; Środki do pielęgnacji fok narciarskich i snowboardowych
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Зимни спортове и дейности > Каране на ски и сноуборд > Вакса за ски и сноуборд: Готови вакси за подготовка на ски и сноуборд; Вакса за спускане за ски и сноуборд; Вакса за сцепление за ски и сноуборд; Импрегнанти за колани за ски и сноуборд
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาและกิจกรรมในฤดูหนาว > สกีและสโนว์บอร์ด > แวกซ์สำหรับสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด: แว็กซ์รองพื้นสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; แวกซ์สำหรับเล่นสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; แวกซ์ยึดเกาะสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด; ผลิตภัณฑ์ดูแลแผ่นสกินสกีและสโนว์บอร์ด
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Зимние виды спорта и игры > Лыжный спорт и сноубординг > Мази для лыж и сноубордов: Базовые парафины для лыж и сноубордов; Мази скольжения для лыж и сноубордов; Мази держания для лыж и сноубордов; Средства для ухода за камусами лыж и сноубордов
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 冬季運動 > 單/雙板滑雪 > 滑雪板蠟: 雙板與單板滑雪板底蠟; 滑雪板蠟塊; 滑雪板防滑蠟; 雙板與單板滑雪板止滑貼皮處理劑
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Winter Sports & Activities > Skiing & Snowboarding > Ski & Snowboard Wax: Ski & Snowboard Base Prep Wax; Ski & Snowboard Glide Wax; Ski & Snowboard Grip Wax; Ski & Snowboard Skin Treatments
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Wintersport en -activiteiten > Skiën en snowboarden > Ski- en snowboardwax: Basiswax voor ski's en snowboards; Ski- en snowboardglijwax; Ski- en snowboardgripwax; Behandelingen voor ski- en snowboardvellen
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Žiemos sportas ir veikla > Slidinėjimas ir snieglenčių sportas > Slidžių ir snieglenčių vaškas: Slidinėjimo ir snieglenčių pagrindo vaškas; Slidžių ir snieglenčių slydimą gerinantis vaškas; Slidžių ir snieglenčių sukibimą gerinantis vaškas; Slidžių ir snieglenčių kamuso priežiūros priemonės
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Vintersporter och -aktiviteter > Skid- och snowboardåkning > Skid- och snowboardvalla: Grundvalla för skidor och snowboard; Skid- och snowboardglidvax; Skid- och snowboardfästvax; Stighudsbehandling för skidor och snowboard
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Zimní sporty a aktivity > Lyžování a snowboarding > Vosky na lyže a snowboardy: Základové vosky na lyže a snowboardy; Skluzné vosky (glide) na lyže a snowboardy; Stoupací vosky (grip) na lyže a snowboardy; Přípravky na stoupací pásy pro lyže a snowboardy
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Talviurheilu ja -harrastukset > Hiihto ja lumilautailu > Suksi- ja lumilautavaha: Suksien ja lumilautojen pohjustusvoiteet; Suksien ja lumilaudan liukasvaha; Suksien ja lumilaudan kitkavaha; Suksien ja lumilautojen nousukarvojen hoitoaineet